src/fst/stems/abbreviations.lexc
! ============================= !
! File containing abbreviations !
! ============================= !

! Lexica for adding tags and periods
! ----------------------------------

! Splitting in 3 groups, because of the preprocessor
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON Abbreviation
noperiod ;
ITRAB ;
TRNUMAB ;
TRAB ;

! Now splitting according to POS, and according to dot or not
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

! First collecting POS info, *-noun, *-adv, etc.
! Also splitting when in doubt: -noun-adj => -noun and -adj
! Then pointing to two contlexes, a dot-one and a non-dot-one.

LEXICON ab ! No POS, don't know what pos
ab-nodot ;
ab-dot ;

LEXICON ab-noun
ab-nodot-noun ;
ab-dot-noun ;

!LEXICON ab-adj
!ab-nodot-adj ;
!ab-dot-adj ;

!LEXICON ab-adv
!ab-nodot-adv ;
!ab-dot-adv ;

!LEXICON ab-num
!ab-nodot-num ;
!ab-dot-num;

! Here come POS and Case tags, and no period.

LEXICON ab-nodot-noun ! The bulk
+N+ABBR: # ;  ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Sg+Dat+Def:%-нтень # ;
+N+ABBR+Sg+Gen+Def:%-нть # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Gen+Indef:%-нь # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Nom+Indef:%-сь # ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-noun-back ! The bulk
+N+ABBR: # ;  ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Sg+Dat+Def:%-нтень # ;
+N+ABBR+Sg+Gen+Def:%-нть # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Gen+Indef:%-нь # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Ine+Indef:%-со # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Ine+Def:%-сонть # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Nom+Indef:%-сь # ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-noun-front ! The bulk
+N+ABBR: # ;  ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Sg+Dat+Def:%-нтень # ;
+N+ABBR+Sg+Gen+Def:%-нть # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Gen+Indef:%-нь # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Ine+Indef:%-сэ # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Ine+Def:%-сэнть # ;
+N+ABBR+SP+Nom+Indef:%-сь # ;

LEXICON ab-nodot ! default
+ABBR: # ;  ! no period, that is.

! Here come POS and Case tags, with the period added.

LEXICON ab-dot ! Default
+ABBR:%. # ;

LEXICON ab-dot-noun ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
+N+ABBR:%. # ;

! The idea is that the nominal ones may have case, like e.g. P.E.N.


! The abbreviation lexicon itself
! -------------------------------

! The ones without final period are listed first. They do not
! need the transitivity division.

LEXICON ITRAB


в ab ;
г ab ;
гг ab ;


! =============================================== !
!    Transitive number-related abbreviations      !
! =============================================== !

! These ones are transitive when followed by numbers or
! singleton letters, and intransitive elsewhere.
! Gården har Gnr. 10.
! Gården har Gnr. 5. a.
! Alle gårder har ikke Gnr. CLB Det er et problem.
! Alle gårder har ikke Gnr. og det er et problem.

LEXICON TRNUMAB

Apd		ab-dot ;                                      !
Вып ab-dot ;


! =============================================== !
!              Transitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !

LEXICON noperiod
вп ab-nodot-noun "км" ;
км² ab-nodot-noun ;
км ab-nodot-noun ;
см ab-nodot-noun ;
гг ab-nodot-noun ;
м3/с ab-nodot-noun ;
кв  ab-nodot-noun ;
млн ab-nodot-noun-back ;
млрд ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ААНИИ ab-nodot-noun ;
АвтоВАЗ ab-nodot-noun ;
АЗС ab-nodot-noun ;
АККОР ab-nodot-noun ;
АМР ab-nodot-noun ;
АН  ab-nodot-noun ;
АНО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
АО  ab-nodot-noun ;
АПК ab-nodot-noun ;
АПО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
АПП ab-nodot-noun ;
АРЕ ab-nodot-noun ;
АСИ ab-nodot-noun ;
АсПУр ab-nodot-noun ;
АСРОС ab-nodot-noun ;
АССР ab-nodot-noun-front ;
АТК  ab-nodot-noun ;
АТО ab-nodot-noun ;
АТОС ab-nodot-noun ;
АТП ab-nodot-noun ;
АТС ab-nodot-noun ;
АУ  ab-nodot-noun ;
АФК ab-nodot-noun ;
АФУН ab-nodot-noun ;
АЭС ab-nodot-noun-front ;
БАМ ab-nodot-noun ;
БАО ab-nodot-noun ;
БЕАР ab-nodot-noun ;
БКД ab-nodot-noun ;
БКП ab-nodot-noun ;
БМВ ab-nodot-noun ;
БНР ab-nodot-noun ;
БРИКС ab-nodot-noun ;
БТИ ab-nodot-noun ;
ВАД ab-nodot-noun ;
ВАЗ ab-nodot-noun ;
ВАК ab-nodot-noun ;
ВАСХНИЛ ab-nodot-noun ;
ВВС ab-nodot-noun ;
ВГТРК ab-nodot-noun ;
ВДК ab-nodot-noun ;
ВДПО ab-nodot-noun ;
ВИА  ab-nodot-noun ;
ВКСШ ab-nodot-noun ;
ВМП  ab-nodot-noun ;
ВМФ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ВНИГРИ ab-nodot-noun ;
ВОБ ab-nodot-noun ;
ВОЗ ab-nodot-noun ;
ВОИР  ab-nodot-noun ;
ВОСВОД ab-nodot-noun ;
ВПП ab-nodot-noun ;
ВСУ ab-nodot-noun ;
ВТБ ab-nodot-noun ;
ВУЗ ab-nodot-noun ;
ВЦИОМ ab-nodot-noun ;
ВЦСПС ab-nodot-noun ;
ВЭД ab-nodot-noun ;
ГАПОУ ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ГАУ ab-nodot-noun ;
ГБПОУ ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ГБУЗ ab-nodot-noun ;
ГЖК ab-nodot-noun ;
ГИЗ ab-nodot-noun ;
ГИТИС ab-nodot-noun ;
ГК ab-nodot-noun ;
ГКУ ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ГлавПУР ab-nodot-noun ;
ГПС ab-nodot-noun ;
ГПУ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ГРПП ab-nodot-noun ;
ГРЭС ab-nodot-noun ;
ГСМ ab-nodot-noun ;
ГТО ab-nodot-noun ;
ГУ ab-nodot-noun ;
ГУП ab-nodot-noun ;
ГЭС  ab-nodot-noun ;
ДЗОТ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ДИП  ab-nodot-noun ;
ДКБ ab-nodot-noun ;
ДНД ab-nodot-noun ;
ДНТ ab-nodot-noun ;
ДПД  ab-nodot-noun ;
ДПП ab-nodot-noun ;
ДРБ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ДРСУ ab-nodot-noun ;
ДСО ab-nodot-noun ;
ДТ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ДХС ab-nodot-noun ;
ДЮКФП ab-nodot-noun ;
ДЮФКП ab-nodot-noun ;
ЕГИСЗ ab-nodot-noun ;
ЕС ab-nodot-noun-front ;
ЕТС ab-nodot-noun ;
ЕЭС ab-nodot-noun-front ;
ЖКО ab-nodot-noun ;
ЖЭС ab-nodot-noun ;
ЗАГС  ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ЗАО   ab-nodot-noun ;
ЗИЛ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ИГИЛ ab-nodot-noun ;
ИК ab-nodot-noun ;
ИМЦП ab-nodot-noun ;
ИП ab-nodot-noun ;
ИПККНО ab-nodot-noun ;
ИТР ab-nodot-noun ;
ИЯЛИ ab-nodot-noun ;
КАМАЗ ab-nodot-noun ;
КАС ab-nodot-noun ;
КБО  ab-nodot-noun ;
КВЖД ab-nodot-noun ;
КВЧ ab-nodot-noun ;
КГБ  ab-nodot-noun ;
КЖД ab-nodot-noun ;
КИП ab-nodot-noun ;
КИПТ ab-nodot-noun ;
ККОВ ab-nodot-noun ;
КНВ ab-nodot-noun ;
КНДР ab-nodot-noun ;
КНЦ ab-nodot-noun ;
КП  ab-nodot-noun ;
КПДН ab-nodot-noun ;
КПП ab-nodot-noun ;
КПСС  ab-nodot-noun ;
КПУ ab-nodot-noun ;
КРАГСиУ ab-nodot-noun ;
КРБ ab-nodot-noun ;
КРИРОиПК ab-nodot-noun ;
КРОО ab-nodot-noun ;
КРТК ab-nodot-noun ;
КТП ab-nodot-noun ;
КУПНО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
КЭБ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ЛДК ab-nodot-noun ;
ЛЗУ ab-nodot-noun ;
ЛПК  ab-nodot-noun ;
ЛПХ ab-nodot-noun ;
ЛТО ab-nodot-noun ;
ЛУАД ab-nodot-noun ;
ЛФК ab-nodot-noun ;
МАГАТЭ ab-nodot-noun ;
МАПО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
МАССР  ab-nodot-noun-front ;
МАФУН ab-nodot-noun ;
МБОУ ab-nodot-noun-back ;
МВФ ab-nodot-noun ;
МГПИ ab-nodot-noun ;
МГПУ ab-nodot-noun-back ;
МЖКХ ab-nodot-noun ;
МинЖКХ ab-nodot-noun ;
ММС  ab-nodot-noun ;
МОК  ab-nodot-noun ;
МП ab-nodot-noun ;
МПС  ab-nodot-noun ;
МРКБ ab-nodot-noun ;
МРМЦ ab-nodot-noun ;
МРО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
МСНК ab-nodot-noun ;
МССР  ab-nodot-noun-front ;
МТФ  ab-nodot-noun ;
МУП ab-nodot-noun ;
МФЦ ab-nodot-noun ;
МЧС ab-nodot-noun ;
НА ab-nodot-noun ;
НАО ab-nodot-noun ;
НАТО ab-nodot-noun ;
НГДУ ab-nodot-noun ;
НДФЛ ab-nodot-noun ;
НИИИС ab-nodot-noun ;
НИЛ ab-nodot-noun ;
НКВД  ab-nodot-noun ;
НКСД ab-nodot-noun ;
НЛО  ab-nodot-noun ;
НП  ab-nodot-noun ;
НПО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
НРБ ab-nodot-noun ;
НСПК ab-nodot-noun ;
НТВ ab-nodot-noun ;
НХЛ ab-nodot-noun ;
ОАО ab-nodot-noun ;
ОАЭ ab-nodot-noun ;
ОбОНО ab-nodot-noun ;
ОБХСС  ab-nodot-noun ;
ОВД ab-nodot-noun ;
ОГИПТАД ab-nodot-noun ;
ОГПУ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ОИКК ab-nodot-noun ;
ОКК-РКИ ab-nodot-noun ;
ОМВД ab-nodot-noun ;
ОМСН ab-nodot-noun ;
ОНФ ab-nodot-noun ;
ООН  ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ОРВИ ab-nodot-noun ;
ОСВОД ab-nodot-noun ;
ОТФ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ОУН-УПА ab-nodot-noun ;
ПАК ab-nodot-noun ;
ПАТП ab-nodot-noun ;
ПДД ab-nodot-noun ;
ПЛ ab-nodot-noun ;
ПМЭФ ab-nodot-noun ;
ППС ab-nodot-noun ;
ПСК ab-nodot-noun ;
ПСО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ПТУ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ПУРП  ab-nodot-noun ;
ПФО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ПЭМФ ab-nodot-noun ;
РАЕН ab-nodot-noun ;
РАН ab-nodot-noun ;
РАПП  ab-nodot-noun ;
РВА ab-nodot-noun ;
РГПУ ab-nodot-noun ;
РДДМ ab-nodot-noun ;
РДЮСШ ab-nodot-noun ;
РИА ab-nodot-noun ;
РИПКРО ab-nodot-noun ;
РКБ ab-nodot-noun ;
РККА  ab-nodot-noun ;
РКСМ  ab-nodot-noun ;
РМЗ ab-nodot-noun ;
РМЦ  ab-nodot-noun ;
РО ab-nodot-noun ;
РОВД ab-nodot-noun ;
РОСНАНО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
РПД  ab-nodot-noun ;
РПЦ ab-nodot-noun ;
РСДПР ab-nodot-noun ;
РСТ ab-nodot-noun ;
РСФР ab-nodot-noun ;
РСФСР  ab-nodot-noun ;
РСЧС ab-nodot-noun ;
РТПЦ ab-nodot-noun ;
РУДН ab-nodot-noun ;
РФ   ab-nodot-noun ;
РФФИ ab-nodot-noun ;
РЭС ab-nodot-noun ;
САПР ab-nodot-noun ;
СБУ ab-nodot-noun ;
СВО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
СД  ab-nodot-noun ;
СЗФО ab-nodot-noun ;
СК ab-nodot-noun ;
СКУ ab-nodot-noun ;
СЛДК ab-nodot-noun ;
СЛПК ab-nodot-noun ;
СМЗ  ab-nodot-noun ;
СМИТ ab-nodot-noun ;
СНГ ab-nodot-noun ;
СОБР ab-nodot-noun ;
СОЦ ab-nodot-noun ;
СП ab-nodot-noun ;
СПбГИК ab-nodot-noun ;
СПбГУСЭ ab-nodot-noun ;
СПО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
СПОГАТ ab-nodot-noun ;
СС ab-nodot-noun ;
ССП  ab-nodot-noun ;
СССР  ab-nodot-noun-front ;
СТЗ ab-nodot-noun ;
СТФ   ab-nodot-noun ;
СУ ab-nodot-noun ;
СУС  ab-nodot-noun ;
СЦБТ ab-nodot-noun ;
США  ab-nodot-noun-back ;
СыктГУ ab-nodot-noun ;
ТАП  ab-nodot-noun ;
ТАССР ab-nodot-noun ;
ТИК ab-nodot-noun ;
ТКЗХ ab-nodot-noun ;
ТКО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ТНТ ab-nodot-noun ;
ТОО ab-nodot-noun ;
ТОС ab-nodot-noun ;
ТПК ab-nodot-noun ;
ТРЦ ab-nodot-noun ;
ТУ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ТЭФИ ab-nodot-noun ;
УАЗ  ab-nodot-noun ;
УБОП ab-nodot-noun ;
УВД-ОВД ab-nodot-noun ;
УГИБДД ab-nodot-noun ;
УдГУ ab-nodot-noun ;
УЗИ  ab-nodot-noun ;
УИК ab-nodot-noun ;
УКОМ ab-nodot-noun ;
УКС ab-nodot-noun ;
УНА-УПА ab-nodot-noun ;
УОНО  ab-nodot-noun ;
УПН ab-nodot-noun ;
УРБ ab-nodot-noun ;
УСЕВЛОН ab-nodot-noun ;
УССР  ab-nodot-noun-front ;
УФПС ab-nodot-noun ;
УФСИН ab-nodot-noun ;
УЧК  ab-nodot-noun ;
ФАС ab-nodot-noun ;
ФГУП ab-nodot-noun ;
ФЗО  ab-nodot-noun ;
ФИФА ab-nodot-noun ;
ФКС ab-nodot-noun ;
ФМБА ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ФНС ab-nodot-noun ;
ФПГ ab-nodot-noun ;
ФРГ  ab-nodot-noun-front ;
ФСБ ab-nodot-noun ;
ФСКН ab-nodot-noun ;
ХАД ab-nodot-noun ;
ЦБТИ ab-nodot-noun ;
ЦГА  ab-nodot-noun ;
ЦЗН ab-nodot-noun ;
ЦК  ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ЦНИИМЭ ab-nodot-noun ;
ЦРБ ab-nodot-noun ;
ЦРУ ab-nodot-noun ;
ЦСУ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ЦУМ ab-nodot-noun ;
ЧАЭС ab-nodot-noun ;
ЧК  ab-nodot-noun ;
ЧОС ab-nodot-noun ;
ЧС ab-nodot-noun ;
ШВК ab-nodot-noun ;
ШКМ  ab-nodot-noun ;
ЭВМ ab-nodot-noun ;
ЭКО ab-nodot-noun-back ;
ЮАР ab-nodot-noun ;
ЮНЕСКО ab-nodot-noun ;
ЮЭС ab-nodot-noun ;
LEXICON TRAB
досл ab-dot ;
А ab-noun ;
Б ab-noun ;
В ab-noun ;
Г ab-noun ;
Д ab-noun ;
Е ab-noun ;
Ж ab-noun ;
З ab-noun ;
И ab-noun ;
Й ab-noun ;
К ab-noun ;
Л ab-noun ;
М ab-noun ;
Н ab-noun ;
О ab-noun ;
П ab-noun ;
Р ab-noun ;
С ab-noun ;
Т ab-noun ;
У ab-noun ;
Ф ab-noun ;
Х ab-noun ;
Ц ab-noun ;
Ч ab-noun ;
Ш ab-noun ;
Щ ab-noun ;
Ъ ab-noun ;
Ы ab-noun ;
Ь ab-noun ;
Э ab-noun ;
Ю ab-noun ;
Я ab-noun ;
Ё ab-noun ;
а ab-noun ;
б ab-noun ;
в ab-noun ;
г ab-noun ;
д ab-noun ;
е ab-noun ;
ж ab-noun ;
з ab-noun ;
и ab-noun ;
й ab-noun ;
к ab-noun ;
л ab-noun ;
м ab-noun ;
н ab-noun ;
о ab-noun ;
п ab-noun ;
р ab-noun ;
с ab-noun ;
т ab-noun ;
у ab-noun ;
ф ab-noun ;
х ab-noun ;
ц ab-noun ;
ч ab-noun ;
ш ab-noun ;
щ ab-noun ;
ъ ab-noun ;
ы ab-noun ;
ь ab-noun ;
э ab-noun ;
ю ab-noun ;
я ab-noun ;
ё ab-noun ;
